Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-103.16 of Title 70, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Department of Education shall create and manage a
database for registering all school support employees as defined in
Section 1-116 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The database
may be administered within or integrated with existing educator
certification or personnel tracking systems of the Department.
B. For each school support employee, the database shall
include:
1. The full legal name of the support employee;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3261 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. The name of the employing school district and school site
including the employee’s position or role; and
3. A unique, permanent identification number issued by the
Department that shall be used to identify the support employee for
employment verification and record continuity across school
districts and other employment records maintained by the Department.
The identification number shall not be reassigned or altered due to
a change in employing school district or subsequent employment
within the public education system of this state.
C. No later than October 1, 2027, and by October 1 annually
thereafter, each school district shall submit the information
required in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subsection B of this section to
the Department for all employed support personnel. Corrections and
updates may be made until October 15 annually when the submitted
information shall be certified by the school district
superintendent.
D. Each school district shall update the information required
by this section within thirty (30) days of hiring a new support
employee and within thirty (30) days of a support employee’s
termination or other separation from employment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
April 21, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3261 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)